ko: 스포츠용품 > 야외 레크레이션 > 겨울 스포츠/액티비티 > 스키/스노보드 > 스노보드 바인딩: 스플릿보드 바인딩; 스텝인 스노보드 바인딩
da: Sportsartikler > Friluftsliv > Vintersport og -aktiviteter > Ski og snowboard > Snowboardbindinger: Splitboard-bindinger; Step-in-snowboardbindinger
tr: Spor Malzemeleri > Açık Hava Etkinlikleri > Kış Sporları ve Aktiviteleri > Kayak ve Snowboard > Snowboard Bağlantıları: Splitboard bağlamaları; Step-in snowboard bağlamaları
ru: Спортивные товары > Активный отдых на открытом воздухе > Зимние виды спорта и игры > Лыжный спорт и сноубординг > Крепления для сноубордов: Крепления для сплитбордов; Крепления step-in для сноуборда
sl-SI: Športna oprema > Rekreacija na prostem > Zimski športi in dejavnosti > Smučanje in deskanje na snegu > Vezi za snežne deske: Vezi za splitboard snežne deske; Step-in snowboard vezi
it: Articoli sportivi > Ricreazione outdoor > Sport e attività invernali > Sci e snowboard > Attacchi da snowboard: Attacchi da splitboard; Attacchi da snowboard step-in
nb: Sportsutstyr > Friluftsliv > Vintersport og aktiviteter > Ski- og snowboardutstyr > Snowboardbindinger: Splitboardbindinger; Step-in-snowboardbindinger
en: Sporting Goods > Outdoor Recreation > Winter Sports & Activities > Skiing & Snowboarding > Snowboard Bindings: Splitboard Bindings; Step-In Snowboard Bindings
el: Αθλητικά είδη > Υπαίθριες δραστηριότητες αναψυχής > Χειμερινά αθλήματα & δραστηριότητες > Σκι & σνόουμπορντ > Δέστρες σνόουμπορντ: Δέστρες για splitboard; Δέστρες snowboard Step-In
fr: Équipements sportifs > Loisirs de plein air > Activités et sports d'hiver > Ski et snowboard > Fixations de snowboard: Fixations de splitboard; Fixations de snowboard step-in
ro-RO: Articole sportive > Recreere în aer liber > Activități și sporturi de iarnă > Schi și snowboarding > Legături pentru snowboard: Legături pentru splitboard; Legături de snowboard cu prindere automată
pt-BR: Artigos esportivos > Atividades ao ar livre > Esportes e atividades de inverno > Esqui e snowboarding > Amarrações para snowboard: Fixações para splitboard; Fixações step-in para snowboard
sk-SK: Športový tovar > Exteriérové rekreakčné športy > Zimné športy a aktivity > Lyžovanie a snowboarding > Snowboardové viazanie: Viazanie na splitboard; Snowboardové viazanie typu step-in
es: Equipamiento deportivo > Actividades al aire libre > Actividades y deportes de invierno > Esquí y snowboard > Fijaciones de snowboard: Fijaciones de splitboard; Fijaciones de snowboard step-in
cs: Sportovní potřeby > Outdoorové aktivity > Zimní sporty a aktivity > Lyžování a snowboarding > Vázání na snowboard: Splitboardová vázání; Nášlapná vázání na snowboard
zh-TW: 體育用品 > 室外休閒 > 冬季運動 > 單/雙板滑雪 > 滑雪板鞋固定器: 分離式單板滑雪板固定器; 快穿單板滑雪板固定器
pl: Sprzęt sportowy > Rekreacja na świeżym powietrzu > Sporty zimowe i rekreacja zimą > Jazda na nartach i snowboardzie > Wiązania snowboardowe: Wiązania do splitboardu; Wiązania snowboardowe typu step-in
zh-CN: 体育用品 > 户外休闲 > 冬季运动与活动 > 滑雪与单板滑雪 > 单板滑雪固定器: 分离式单板滑雪固定器; 踩踏式单板滑雪固定器
th: อุปกรณ์กีฬา > สันทนาการกลางแจ้ง > กีฬาและกิจกรรมในฤดูหนาว > สกีและสโนว์บอร์ด > ที่ยึดเท้ากับสโนว์บอร์ด: ไบดิ้งสปลิตบอร์ด; ไบดิ้งสโนว์บอร์ดแบบสเต็ปอิน
ja: スポーツ用品 > 屋外レクリエーション > ウィンタースポーツ > スキー・スノーボード用品 > スノーボード用ビンディング: スプリットボード用ビンディング; ステップインスノーボードビンディング
sv: Sportartiklar > Utomhusaktiviteter > Vintersporter och -aktiviteter > Skid- och snowboardåkning > Snowboardbindningar: Splitboardbindningar; Step-in-bindningar för snowboard
pt-PT: Artigos de desporto > Atividades recreativas no exterior > Atividades e desportos de inverno > Esqui e snowboard > Fixadores de snowboard: Fixações de splitboard; Fixações de snowboard step-in
hu: Sportszerek > Szabadtéri kikapcsolódás > Téli sportok és tevékenységek > Síelés és snowboardozás > Snowboardkötők: Splitboardkötések; Belépős snowboardkötések
hr-HR: Sportska oprema > Rekreacija na otvorenom > Zimski sportovi i aktivnosti > Skijanje i snowboardanje > Vezovi za snowboarde: Vezovi za splitboard; Ugradbeni vezovi za snowboarde
nl: Sportartikelen > Buitenrecreatie > Wintersport en -activiteiten > Skiën en snowboarden > Snowboardbindingen: Splitboardbindingen; Step-in-snowboardbindingen
bg-BG: Спортни стоки > Спортни занимания на открито > Зимни спортове и дейности > Каране на ски и сноуборд > Сноуборд автомати: Автомати за сплитборд; Сноуборд автомати със система за бързо влизане
vi: Dụng cụ thể thao > Giải trí ngoài trời > Hoạt động và thể thao mùa đông > Trượt tuyết băng đồng và trượt ván trên tuyết > Phần gắn dính ván tuyết: Ngàm gắn giày ván trượt tách đôi; Ngàm gắn giày ván trượt tuyết đạp gót
de: Sportartikel > Outdoor-Aktivitäten > Wintersport & -Aktivitäten > Skisport & Snowboarden > Snowboard-Bindungen: Splitboard-Bindungen; Step-in-Snowboardbindungen
fi: Urheilutarvikkeet > Ulkoharrasteet > Talviurheilu ja -harrastukset > Hiihto ja lumilautailu > Lumilautojen siteet: Splitboard-siteet; Step-in-lumilautasiteet
lt-LT: Sporto prekės > Poilsis lauke > Žiemos sportas ir veikla > Slidinėjimas ir snieglenčių sportas > Snieglenčių apkaustai: Padalintos snieglentės tvirtinimai; Įlipami snieglentės apkaustai